Hawaii statutes.
§660-7 Order to show cause in lieu of writ.
The court or judge to whom the complaint is made may issue an order directing
the person by whom the party is imprisoned or restrained, to appear and show
cause for the imprisonment or restraint at such time as the court shall direct,
but not later than five days from the date of the order to show cause; provided
that whenever the record shows that there is a material issue of fact to be
resolved by the taking of evidence the court shall order that the person detained
be produced for the hearing. [L 1953, c 101, §4; RL 1955, §239-7; HRS §660-7;
am L 1972, c 90, §5(e)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next